District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Park Concessions Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 3 of the Recreation Act of 1994, effective March 23, 1995 (D.C. Law 10-246;
D.C. Official Code § 10-302), is amended by adding a new subsection (g) to read as follows:
“(g)(1) Beginning in Fiscal Year 2026, and on an annual basis thereafter, in accordance with the
Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code §
1-328.11 et seq.), the Department shall issue at least 8 grants, of value greater than $8,000 but less than
$12,000 each, to individual vendors to provide beverages or light fare at Department facilities, including
recreation centers and parks, on a seasonal basis. The grantees shall demonstrate previous experience in
providing similar food and beverage services.
“(2) A vendor receiving a grant under this subsection shall:
“(A) Obtain the required permits to operate and sell food and beverages at
Department parks and facilities;


“(B) Operate from April 1st to October 31st during the facility hours set by the
Department, for a minimum of 50% of the facility hours set by the Department for that facility;
“(C) Accept payment via cash, credit, and debit transactions;
“(D) Not sell alcoholic beverages or cannabis products;
“(E) Continually ensure that the physical space where vending service is
provided and the immediate surroundings are clean and neat;
“(F) Handle all trash in a safe and controlled manner to avoid spills and leaking
containers; and
“(G) Partner with the Department to ensure that their vending services are a true
complement to park services and do not hinder park visitors from accessing any Department equipment or
amenities.
“(3) The Department shall provide to grantees:
“(A) Access to a secure, moderate storage space on site;
“(B) Access to trash containers used by the Department on site; and
“(C) First priority in re-applying for the seasonal grant in subsequent years.
“(4) The Department shall:
“(A) Select at least one Department recreation center per ward at which the
vendors issued grants will operate; and
“(B) Work in consultation with ward councilmembers when selecting the
Department recreation center in their ward.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and
financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an
approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the
certification.


(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the
District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October 16,
2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as provided in section
602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C.
Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).